Utah statutes.
63M-1-1605.   Program manager.

(1)  The director of the Governor's Office of Economic Development shall appoint a director for the Office of Rural Development with the approval of the governor.

(2)  The director of the Office of Rural Development shall be a person knowledgeable in the field of rural economic development and planning and experienced in administration.

(3)  Upon change of the director of the Governor's Office of Economic Development, the director of the Office of Rural Development may not be dismissed without cause for at least 180 days.

(4)  The director of the Office of Rural Development shall be a member of the Rural Coordinating Committee's Steering Committee created in Subsection 63C-10-202(3).

